ko: 보호 안경 표준 준수: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF 인증; 기타
el: Συμμόρφωση με τα πρότυπα για τα προστατευτικά γυαλιά: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; Πιστοποίηση WSF; Άλλο
th: การปฏิบัติตามมาตรฐานแว่นตาป้องกัน: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; รับรองมาตรฐานโดย WSF; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Conformitate cu standardele privind ochelarii de protecție: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; Certificare WSF; Altele
fr: Conformité des lunettes de protection aux normes: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; Certifié WSF; Autre
ja: 保護眼鏡の規格適合性: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF認証済み; その他
fi: Suojalasien standardienmukaisuus: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF-sertifioitu; Muu
lt-LT: Apsauginių akinių atitiktis standartams: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; „WSF“ sertifikatas; Kita
hu: Védőszemüveg szabványmegfelelősége: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF-minősített; Egyéb
pt-BR: Óculos de proteção conformidade com norma: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; Certificação WSF; Outro
pt-PT: Conformidade com as normas para óculos de proteção: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; Certificação WSF; Outra
sk-SK: Súlad ochranných okuliarov s normami: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; Certifikácia WSF; Iné
de: Einhaltung von Schutzbrillenstandards: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF-zertifiziert; Sonstige
bg-BG: Съответствие със стандартите за защитни очила: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF сертифицирани; Друго
nb: Samsvar med standarder for vernebriller: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF-sertifisert; Annet
zh-TW: 防護眼鏡標準符合性: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF 認證; 其他
it: Conformità agli standard per gli occhiali di protezione: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; Certificazione WSF; Altro
es: Cumplimiento del estándar de uso de gafas de protección: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; Certificación WSF; Otro
nl: Beschermbril normconformiteit: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF-gecertificeerd; Anders
pl: Zgodność z normą okularów ochronnych: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; Certyfikat WSF; Inne
sl-SI: Skladnost zaščitnih očal s standardi: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; Certificirano pri WSF; Drugo
en: Protective eyewear standard compliance: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF certified; Other
sv: Standardefterlevnad för skyddsglasögon: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF-certifierad; Övrigt
zh-CN: 护目镜标准合规性: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF 认证; 其他
vi: Tuân thủ tiêu chuẩn kính bảo hộ: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; Chứng nhận WSF; Khác
ru: Соответствие стандартам защитных очков: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; Сертификация WSF; Другое
tr: Koruyucu gözlük standartlarına uygunluk: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF sertifikalı; Diğer
hr-HR: Usuglašenost sa standardima za zaštitne naočale: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF certifikat; Ostalo
cs: Shoda s normami pro ochranné brýle: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; S certifikací WSF; Ostatní
da: Overholdelse af standarder for beskyttelsesbriller: ANSI Z87.1; AS/NZS 1337; ASTM F803; BS 7930-1; CSA Z94.3; EN 166; ISO 12312-1; WSF-certificeret; Anden